Utah statutes.
76-7-310.5.   Prohibition of specified abortion procedures -- Viability
defined.
(1)  As used in this section, "saline abortion procedure" means performance of
amniocentesis and injection of saline into the amniotic sac within the uterine
cavity.
(2) (a)  After viability has been determined in accordance with Subsection
(2)(b), no person may knowingly perform a saline abortion procedure unless all
other available abortion procedures would pose a risk to the life or the
health of the pregnant woman.
(b)  For purposes of this section determination of viability shall be made by
the physician, based upon his own best clinical judgment.  The physician shall
determine whether, based on the particular facts of a woman's pregnancy that
are known to him, and in light of medical technology and information
reasonably available to him, there is a realistic possibility of maintaining
and nourishing a life outside of the womb, with or without temporary,
artificial life-sustaining support.
(3)  Intentional, knowing, and willful violation of this section is a third
degree felony.
